Louisiana, session 2026, HB186.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:67.8 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§67.8. Theft of Louisiana Giving All True Opportunity to Rise (LA GATOR)
Scholarship Program funds; penalties; restitution
A. No person shall intentionally misuse any account funds, as defined in R.S.
17:4037.3, associated with the LA GATOR Scholarship Program for any purpose not
provided in Chapter 43-C of Title 17 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
B.(1) Whoever violates the provisions of this Section when the
misappropriation or taking amounts to twenty-five thousand dollars or more shall be
imprisoned at hard labor for not more than twenty years, fined not more than fifty
thousand dollars, or both.
(2) When the misappropriation or taking amounts to five thousand dollars
or more, but less than twenty-five thousand dollars, the offender shall be imprisoned
with or without hard labor for not more than ten years, fined not more than ten
thousand dollars, or both.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-855 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 186
(3) When the misappropriation or taking amounts to one thousand dollars or
more, but less than five thousand dollars, the offender shall be imprisoned with or
without hard labor for not more than five years, fined not more than three thousand
dollars, or both.
(4)(a) When the misappropriation or taking amounts to less than one
thousand dollars, the offender shall be imprisoned for not more than six months,
fined not more than one thousand dollars, or both.
(b) If the offender in violation of Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph has
been previously convicted of theft two or more times, upon any subsequent
conviction, the offender shall be imprisoned with or without hard labor for not more
than two years, fined not more than two thousand dollars, or both.
(5) In addition to the penalties provided in Paragraphs (1) through (4) of this
Subsection, a person convicted pursuant to the provisions of this Section shall be
ordered to make full restitution to the victim and any other person who has suffered
a financial loss as a result of the offense in accordance with Code of Criminal
Procedure Article 883.2.